North Dakota statutes. TITLE 25 Mental and Physical Illness or Disability
CHAPTER 25-04 Care of Developmentally Disabled
25-04-11.
Disposition of person who is not a legal resident. [Effective September 1, 2022]

If a person who has no legal residence in this state is subject to admission to the life skills and transition center or other appropriate state facility, by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, such person must be sent, at the expense of the county or human service zone, to the life skills and transition center in the same manner as a resident of this state who is found to be in need of services offered at the life skills and transition center, and the superintendent of the life skills and transition center shall then arrange for the transportation of such person to the place where the person belongs. The department of health and human services shall ascertain the place where such person belongs when the same conveniently can be done.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 146, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 25-0411; S.L. 1957, ch. 196, § 20; 1957 Supp., § 25-0411; S.L. 1967, ch. 214, § 21; 1985, ch. 311, § 9; 1991, ch. 294, § 10; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2019, ch. 391, § 21, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 352, § 296, effective September 1, 2022.

25-04-11.1.
Disposition of nonresidents — Exceptions — Reciprocal agreements.

If a person who has no legal residence in this state or whose residence is unknown is found to be a person requiring care and treatment in the life skills and transition center, the person must be sent to the life skills and transition center in the same manner, and accompanied by the same documents, as in the case of a resident of this state. The supervising department shall immediately inquire as to the residence of the person or the person’s responsible relatives, and, if the residence is found to be in another state or country, the supervising department shall arrange for transportation of the person to the place of legal residence or legal settlement unless the person can be accommodated at the life skills and transition center without depriving a North Dakota resident of care and treatment at the life skills and transition center and adequate costs of care are paid for within a reasonable time, or unless a reciprocal agreement has been entered into with another state regarding the care and commitment of the nonresident. The supervising department may enter into reciprocal agreements with other states regarding the mutual exchange, return, and transportation of persons who are within one state but have legal residence or legal settlement in another state. The agreements may not contain any provision conflicting with any law of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 310, § 2; 1985, ch. 527, § 2; 1989, ch. 69, § 23; 1991, ch. 294, § 11; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2013, ch. 226, § 1.

25-04-11.2.
Liability for care and treatment of nonresident patients.

Nonresident patients at the life skills and transition center and nonresident responsible relatives of patients are liable for the chargeable costs of care and treatment at the life skills and transition center.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 325, § 3; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2013, ch. 226, § 1.

25-04-12.
Electric power may be furnished to city of Dunseith from state school power plant. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1961, ch. 209, § 5.

25-04-13.
Guardianship of person and estate — Superintendent and director of institutions to act as guardians in lieu of court appointment or assumption by parent. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 82.

25-04-13.1.
Guardianship — Superintendent to act as guardian. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 326, § 2.

25-04-14.
Expenses chargeable against patient or patient’s estate — Filing claims. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Expenses for care and treatment of each patient at the life skills and transition center must, if practicable, be in accordance with the cost of providing care and treatment for the different degrees or conditions of mental and physical health and charges may be adjusted in accordance with the patient’s ability to pay which must include an estimate of potential future receipts, including amounts from estates. The supervising department shall recover from the patient or from a discharged patient expenses chargeable for care and treatment. If any patient is receiving social security benefits or is a veteran or a dependent of a veteran who has received, is receiving, or is entitled to receive compensation or pension from the veterans’ administration, the expenses are a current claim against the patient and may be recovered monthly by the supervising department except that any amount required by the payer of the benefits to be paid directly to the patient must, upon approval of the department of human services, be credited to the patient’s personal account from any money thus received.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 527, § 3; 1987, ch. 325, § 4; 1989, ch. 69, § 24; 1991, ch. 295, § 2; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2013, ch. 226, § 1.

Cross-References.

Imposition and collection of fees and expenses, see N.D.C.C. ch. 50-06.3.

25-04-14.
Expenses chargeable against patient or patient’s estate — Filing claims. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Expenses for care and treatment of each patient at the life skills and transition center must, if practicable, be in accordance with the cost of providing care and treatment for the different degrees or conditions of mental and physical health and charges may be adjusted in accordance with the patient’s ability to pay which must include an estimate of potential future receipts, including amounts from estates. The supervising department shall recover from the patient or from a discharged patient expenses chargeable for care and treatment. If any patient is receiving social security benefits or is a veteran or a dependent of a veteran who has received, is receiving, or is entitled to receive compensation or pension from the veterans’ administration, the expenses are a current claim against the patient and may be recovered monthly by the supervising department except that any amount required by the payer of the benefits to be paid directly to the patient must, upon approval of the department of health and human services, be credited to the patient’s personal account from any money thus received.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 527, § 3; 1987, ch. 325, § 4; 1989, ch. 69, § 24; 1991, ch. 295, § 2; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 297, effective September 1, 2022.

25-04-15.
Expenses chargeable against guardianship estate of patient — Restrictions. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The expenses chargeable by the state for the care and treatment of any patient over twenty-one years of age at the life skills and transition center must be charged against the guardianship estate of such patient, if the patient has such an estate, subject to the following restrictions:

No part of the estate may be taken for such purpose if the patient has dependents within the United States dependent upon the estate for support and the taking of all or a portion of the estate would result in undue hardship to those dependents.

No real property belonging to the estate may be sold during the lifetime of the patient except for the maintenance and support of the patient’s dependents, unless it is shown that the sale of the property will not result in undue hardship to those dependents, and it may be sold only upon the order of the district court having jurisdiction of the estate, with the consent of the department of human services.

No personal property belonging to the estate may be sold within five years from the date upon which the patient was sent to the life skills and transition center unless the property is ordered sold by the district court having jurisdiction of the estate for the reason that the property is likely to deteriorate in value during the time herein specified.

No claim may be made to recover from the estate of a former resident of the life skills and transition center who has left the life skills and transition center and married and leaves a spouse or issue dependent upon such estate.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 527, § 5; 1987, ch. 325, § 5; 1989, ch. 69, § 25; 1991, ch. 326, § 77; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2013, ch. 226, § 1.

25-04-15.
Expenses chargeable against guardianship estate of patient — Restrictions. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The expenses chargeable by the state for the care and treatment of any patient over twenty-one years of age at the life skills and transition center must be charged against the guardianship estate of such patient, if the patient has such an estate, subject to the following restrictions:

No part of the estate may be taken for such purpose if the patient has dependents within the United States dependent upon the estate for support and the taking of all or a portion of the estate would result in undue hardship to those dependents.

No real property belonging to the estate may be sold during the lifetime of the patient except for the maintenance and support of the patient’s dependents, unless it is shown that the sale of the property will not result in undue hardship to those dependents, and it may be sold only upon the order of the district court having jurisdiction of the estate, with the consent of the department of health and human services.

No personal property belonging to the estate may be sold within five years from the date upon which the patient was sent to the life skills and transition center unless the property is ordered sold by the district court having jurisdiction of the estate for the reason that the property is likely to deteriorate in value during the time herein specified.

No claim may be made to recover from the estate of a former resident of the life skills and transition center who has left the life skills and transition center and married and leaves a spouse or issue dependent upon such estate.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 527, § 5; 1987, ch. 325, § 5; 1989, ch. 69, § 25; 1991, ch. 326, § 77; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 298, effective September 1, 2022.

25-04-15.1.
Statute of limitations not bar to recovery.

No statute of limitations or similar statute or the doctrine of laches may bar the recovery of costs of care furnished under this chapter. It is not necessary to bill currently any person for those accounts determined to be inactive, currently uncollectible, or for which it has been determined as provided by law that there is no present ability to pay. Current billings may be made for amounts chargeable by law or for which it has been determined the responsible party presently has an ability to pay, but the manner of billing may not affect the total amount due. This section applies to claims for the cost of care furnished on or after July 1, 1961.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 282, § 1.

25-04-16.
Waiver of payment — Use of income tax data — Confidentiality — Definition. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Except with respect to services provided and duties effectuated for persons other than residents of the life skills and transition center who are developmentally disabled, and except with respect to services provided and duties effectuated under subsection 2 of section 25-04-02, the resident, former resident, parent of a resident or former resident under age eighteen, personal representative, or guardian may make application to the supervising department to pay less than the costs or none of the costs incurred by the state for the resident’s care and treatment at the life skills and transition center. An application from a resident, former resident, personal representative, or guardian must be accompanied by proof of the resident’s or the estate of the resident’s inability to pay. An application from a parent of a resident or former resident must be accompanied by proof that the parent has applied for or cooperated fully in an application for medical and medically related services under entitlement from the federal government, medical or hospital insurance contracts, workforce safety and insurance, or medical care and disability programs for provision of services to the resident, and has assured the contribution of those services, compensation, and contract and program benefits to meet the cost of care provided to the resident by the life skills and transition center. A waiver must be granted upon receipt of an application from such a parent, which is complete and supported by the required proofs and is effective for so long as the parent continues to apply for or cooperate fully in applications for services, compensation, and contract and program benefits, and continues to assure the contribution of those services, compensation, and benefits to meet the costs of care. A waiver, once granted with respect to a resident under age eighteen, extinguishes any debt that would otherwise be owed by the resident, the resident’s parents, or the resident’s estate with respect to care and treatment furnished during times the waiver is effective.

Upon receipt of such application, the supervising department shall direct the human service zone of the county from which the patient was admitted to determine whether the application is complete and supported by the required proofs. The supervising department shall approve, reject, or amend the determination made by the human service zone. The determination made by the supervising department may be appealed to the district court of the county of residence of the patient.

Any patient, former patient, parent of a patient or former patient, guardian, or personal representative who seeks relief from the payment of the cost of care and treatment by filing an application for relief of payment shall do so with the understanding that the supervising department may, in its discretion, and to its satisfaction, verify any statement made in such application for relief of payment by a request for information from financial institutions, including commercial banks, and from other sources likely to possess verifying information. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 57-38-57, this verification may include a review of such applicant’s state income tax return or any other document or report submitted to or held by any office or department of the state of North Dakota or any of its political subdivisions.

When any official or employee of the life skills and transition center who, pursuant to subsection 1, obtains income tax information or other tax information from the state tax commissioner the confidentiality of which is protected by law, such official or employee may not divulge such information except to the extent necessary for the administration of this chapter or when otherwise directed by judicial order or when otherwise provided by law.

As used in this chapter, “supervising department” means the department of human services.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 527, § 6; 1989, ch. 69, § 26; 1989, ch. 338, § 4; 1991, ch. 295, § 3; 1993, ch. 280, § 3; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2019, ch. 391, § 22, effective January 1, 2020.

25-04-16.
Waiver of payment — Use of income tax data — Confidentiality — Definition. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Except with respect to services provided and duties effectuated for persons other than residents of the life skills and transition center who are developmentally disabled, and except with respect to services provided and duties effectuated under subsection 2 of section 25-04-02, the resident, former resident, parent of a resident or former resident under age eighteen, personal representative, or guardian may make application to the supervising department to pay less than the costs or none of the costs incurred by the state for the resident’s care and treatment at the life skills and transition center. An application from a resident, former resident, personal representative, or guardian must be accompanied by proof of the resident’s or the estate of the resident’s inability to pay. An application from a parent of a resident or former resident must be accompanied by proof that the parent has applied for or cooperated fully in an application for medical and medically related services under entitlement from the federal government, medical or hospital insurance contracts, workforce safety and insurance, or medical care and disability programs for provision of services to the resident, and has assured the contribution of those services, compensation, and contract and program benefits to meet the cost of care provided to the resident by the life skills and transition center. A waiver must be granted upon receipt of an application from such a parent, which is complete and supported by the required proofs and is effective for so long as the parent continues to apply for or cooperate fully in applications for services, compensation, and contract and program benefits, and continues to assure the contribution of those services, compensation, and benefits to meet the costs of care. A waiver, once granted with respect to a resident under age eighteen, extinguishes any debt that would otherwise be owed by the resident, the resident’s parents, or the resident’s estate with respect to care and treatment furnished during times the waiver is effective.

Upon receipt of such application, the supervising department shall direct the human service zone of the county from which the patient was admitted to determine whether the application is complete and supported by the required proofs. The supervising department shall approve, reject, or amend the determination made by the human service zone. The determination made by the supervising department may be appealed to the district court of the county of residence of the patient.

Any patient, former patient, parent of a patient or former patient, guardian, or personal representative who seeks relief from the payment of the cost of care and treatment by filing an application for relief of payment shall do so with the understanding that the supervising department may, in its discretion, and to its satisfaction, verify any statement made in such application for relief of payment by a request for information from financial institutions, including commercial banks, and from other sources likely to possess verifying information. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 57-38-57, this verification may include a review of such applicant’s state income tax return or any other document or report submitted to or held by any office or department of the state of North Dakota or any of its political subdivisions.

When any official or employee of the life skills and transition center who, pursuant to subsection 1, obtains income tax information or other tax information from the state tax commissioner the confidentiality of which is protected by law, such official or employee may not divulge such information except to the extent necessary for the administration of this chapter or when otherwise directed by judicial order or when otherwise provided by law.

As used in this chapter, “supervising department” means the department of health and human services.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 527, § 6; 1989, ch. 69, § 26; 1989, ch. 338, § 4; 1991, ch. 295, § 3; 1993, ch. 280, § 3; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2019, ch. 391, § 22, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 352, § 299, effective September 1, 2022.

25-04-17.
Reduction or writeoff of accounts — Report to legislative audit and fiscal review committee.

The supervising department may authorize the reduction or writeoff of a patient’s past-due account from the life skills and transition center’s financial records upon determining that the account is not collectible. The supervising department, by September first after the close of each fiscal year, shall present a detailed report to the legislative audit and fiscal review committee on the status of accounts receivable for that fiscal year. The report must include:

An aging by patient classification of accounts remaining unpaid.

The amounts by patient classification by which accounts were reduced or written off for reasons other than payment during that fiscal year.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 325, § 6; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 1995, ch. 272, § 1; 2013, ch. 226, § 1.

25-04-18.
Limitations of this chapter.

The provisions of this chapter may not be construed to limit or broaden the plaintiff class as defined by order of the United States district court for the district of North Dakota entered on January 13, 1981, in civil number A1-80-141.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 338, § 5.

25-04-19.
Quality assurance review committees — Reports — Immunity.

Any information, data, report, or record made available to an internal quality assurance review committee of the life skills and transition center is confidential and may be used by the committee and the members thereof only in the exercise of the proper functions of the committee. The proceedings and records of the committee are not subject to subpoena or discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action arising out of any matter under consideration by the committee. Any information, document, or record otherwise available from original sources is not immune from discovery or use in any civil action merely because it was presented during the proceedings of the committee, nor may any person who testified before the committee or who is a member of it be prevented from testifying as to matters within that person’s knowledge, but a witness cannot be asked about that witness’s testimony before the committee. This section does not relieve any person of any liability incurred as a result of furnishing health care to the resident. No person furnishing information, data, reports, or records to the committee with respect to any resident of the life skills and transition center is, by reason of furnishing the information, data, reports, or records, liable in damages to any resident, or answerable for willful violation of a privileged or confidential communication. No member of the committee is liable in damages to any person for any action taken or recommendation made within the scope of the functions of the committee if the committee member acts without malice and in the reasonable belief that the action or recommendation is warranted by the facts known to the member.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 280, § 4; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 2013, ch. 226, § 1.

25-04-20.
Westwood park assets management committee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 34, § 39.